Massachusetts, session 194th, H677.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts School Building Authority, under the authority granted in Section 3 of
Chapter 70B of the General Laws, shall amend the School Building Grant Program Regulations
(963 CMR 2.0) to provide for reimbursement for the construction or renovation of a swimming
pool at a school in a municipality with a population greater than 35,000 and less than 250,000, a
median household income below the commonwealth’s average and a rate of educational
attainment of a bachelor’s degree or above that is below the commonwealth’s average.
of 1